Louisiana, session 2026, SB459.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:51(1), (3), (4)(a), and (15) are hereby amended and reenacted to
read as follows:
§51. Duties of the department
The Department of Children and Family Services, through its secretary, shall
administer the public assistance and welfare laws of the state as follows:
(1) Make and promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary or
desirable for carrying out the provisions of this Chapter, which rules and regulations
are binding upon the parishes or other local units and their agents and upon such
private agencies and their agents as are subject to the supervision of the department.
* * *
(3) Provide services to parish governments including the organization and
supervision of parish offices for the effective administration of child welfare
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1123 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 459
functions, and carry on such research and compile such information as it shall
consider necessary, having in mind the purposes of this Chapter and its
administration throughout the state.
(4) Establish adequate standards for personnel employed in the state,
regional, or parish offices and make necessary rules and regulations to maintain such
standards as follows:
(a) Fix minimum standards of service and personnel based upon education,
training, previous experience, and general efficiency which must be attained by
persons appointed to the position to be filled in the state, regional, and parish offices.
Any employee that is responsible for conducting investigations into allegations
of child abuse or neglect shall, at a minimum, possess a baccalaureate degree
from an accredited college or university.
* * *
(15) Establish child protection centers wherever they are practical throughout
the state; provide the necessary staff; coordinate the funding of said the centers from
federal, state, parish, municipal, or private funds as they become available;
administer child protection centers for the care, treatment, and protection of abused
and neglected children, and establish rules and regulations to further the said
protection centers. When such centers are established, they shall provide protection
and emergency care, investigation, treatment, and rehabilitation of children and
parents, education programs, record keeping, research, and consultation and shall
develop programs for volunteer participation and seek long-range solutions for child
abuse.
* * *
Section 2. Nothing in this Act shall be construed to change the introductory
paragraph of R.S. 46:51 as amended by Act 477 of the 2025 Regular Session.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1123 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 459